Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska67-239
Partner; transactions with partnership.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, a partner may lend money to, borrow money from, act as a surety, guarantor, or endorser for, guarantee or assume one or more specific obligations of, provide collateral for, and transact other business with the limited partnership and, subject to other applicable law, has the same rights and obligations with respect thereto as a person who is not a partner.

Laws 1981, LB 272, § 7;

Laws 1989, LB 482, § 11.